Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
5. ENFORCEMENT OF SUPPORT ORDER WITHOUT REGISTRATION

Note

Article heading amended by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-501 Employer's receipt of income
withholding order of another state. An income withholding order issued in
another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support
enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor's employer under
sections 571-52, 571-52.2, 571‑52.3, 576D-14, and 576E-16, without first
filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a
tribunal of this State. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 194, §4; am L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next